Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.772

Fire department volunteers—Holding public office—Definitions.

(1) Except as otherwise prohibited by law, a volunteer member of any fire department who does not serve as fire chief for the department may be:

(a) A candidate for elective public office and serve in that public office if elected; or

(b) Appointed to any public office and serve in that public office if appointed.

(2) For purposes of this section, "volunteer" means a member of any fire department who performs voluntarily any assigned or authorized duties on behalf of or at the direction of the fire department without receiving compensation or consideration for performing such duties.

(3) For purposes of this section, "compensation" and "consideration" do not include any benefits the volunteer may have accrued or is accruing under chapter 41.24 RCW.

[ 2006 c 211 s 1.]